Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Subchapter 11 Miscellaneous Provisions

386B.11-010.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing the Uniform Trust Code, as enacted in this chapter, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 91, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.11-020.
Electronic records and signatures.

The provisions of this chapter governing the legal effect, validity, or enforceability of electronic records or electronic signatures, and of contracts formed or performed with the use of such records or signatures, conform to the requirements of Section 102 of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15

U.S.C. sec. 7002

, and supersede, modify, and limit the requirements of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15

U.S.C. secs. 7001

et seq.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 92, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.11-030.
Severability clause.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 93, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.11-040.
Application to existing relationships.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, on July 15, 2014:

This chapter applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 15, 2014;

This chapter applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 15, 2014;

This chapter applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 15, 2014, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of this chapter would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of this chapter shall not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in this chapter applies to trust instruments executed before July 15, 2014, unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 15, 2014, is not affected by this chapter.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 15, 2014, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

This chapter shall not apply to trusts created under the following:

KRS

386.510

to

386.590

, the Kentucky Fiduciary Investment Company Act;

KRS

386.370

to

386.440

, the Kentucky Business Trusts Act; and

KRS Chapter 386A, the Kentucky Uniform Statutory Trust Act.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 94, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.11-050.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Trust Code.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 95, effective July 15, 2014.